North Carolina, session 2025, HB1214.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1.(a) G.S. 64-25 reads as rewritten:
"§ 64-25. Definitions.
The following definitions apply in this Article:
(1) Commissioner. – The North Carolina Commissioner of Labor.
(2) Employ. – Hire an employee.
(3) Employee. – Any individual who provides services or labor for an employer
in this State for wages or other remuneration. The term does not include an
individual whose term of employment is less than nine months in a calendar
year.
(4) Employer. – Any person, business entity, or other organization that transacts
business in this State and that employs 25 or more employees in this State.
This term does not include State agencies, counties, municipalities, or other
governmental bodies.The term also includes any entity required to participate
in E-Verify pursuant to any of the following:
a. State and local entities pursuant to G.S. 126-7.1(i).
b. Counties pursuant to G.S. 153A-99.1.
c. Municipalities pursuant to G.S. 160A-169.1.
(5) E-Verify. – The federal E-Verify program operated by the United States
Department of Homeland Security and other federal agencies, or any
successor or equivalent program used to verify the work authorization of
newly hired employees pursuant to federal law.
(6) Unauthorized alien. – As defined in 8 U.S.C. § 1324a(h)(3)."
*H1214-v-2*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
SECTION 1.(b) G.S. 64-26 reads as rewritten:
"§ 64-26. Verification of employee work authorization.
(a) Employers Must Use E-Verify. – Each employer, after hiring an employee to work in
the United States, shall verify the work authorization of the employee through E-Verify.
(b) Employer Preservation of E-Verify Forms. – Each employer shall retain the record of
the verification of work authorization required by this section while the employee is employed
and for one year thereafter.
(c) Repealed by Session Laws 2013-418, s. 2(g), effective September 4, 2013.
(d) Good-Faith Compliance. – An employer shall be deemed in good-faith compliance
with this Article if the employer timely enrolls in and utilizes E-Verify as required by law,
properly completes and retains all required forms and documentation, and does not knowingly or
with reckless disregard accept fraudulent documentation. An employer acting in good-faith
compliance with this Article shall not be subject to civil penalties under this Article solely
because an employee submitted fraudulent information or documentation that could not
reasonably have been detected."
SECTION 1.(c) G.S. 64-29 reads as rewritten:
"§ 64-29. Investigation of complaints.complaints; compliance checks.
(a) Investigation. – Upon receipt of a complaint filed in accordance with G.S. 64-28, the
Commissioner shall investigate whether a violation of G.S. 64-26 or G.S. 143-133.3 has in fact
occurred.
(a1) Random Compliance Checks. – The Commissioner may conduct random compliance
checks of employers to determine compliance with G.S. 64-26 and G.S. 143-133.3. Random
compliance checks shall be conducted in a neutral and nondiscriminatory manner based on a
randomized sample of all employers registered with the Secretary of State, weighted by size and
industry. Upon selecting an employer for a random compliance check, the Commissioner shall
provide written notice to the employer. The written notice shall include any request for
employment records from the employer, provided that any employment records requested under
this subsection shall be limited to the documentation listed in subsection (e) of this section. The
employer shall provide the Commissioner with the requested employment records within 30
calendar days of receiving the notice of the random compliance check. No employer shall be
subject to a random compliance check more than once per calendar year.
(b) Certain Complaints Shall Not Be Investigated. – The Commissioner shall not
investigate complaints that are based solely on race, religion, gender, ethnicity, or national origin.
(c) Assistance by Law Enforcement. – The Commissioner may request that the State
Bureau of Investigation assist in investigating a complaint under this section.
(d) Subpoena for Production of Documents. – The Commissioner may issue a subpoena
for production of employment records that relate to the recruitment, hiring, employment, or
termination policies, practices, or acts of employment as part of the investigation of a valid
complaint an investigation or compliance check initiated under this section.
(e) Compliance Checks Limited to Documentation. – Any compliance check conducted
pursuant to this section shall be limited to the review of records, documents, reports,
certifications, or other paperwork required by law to be maintained or submitted by the regulated
person or entity. No provision of this section shall be construed to authorize the State, any agency,
department, officer, employee, or contractor thereof to enter upon, inspect, access, or conduct a
physical examination of private property without the consent of the property owner or lawful
occupant, except as otherwise expressly authorized by federal law, State law, or a valid
administrative or judicial warrant. A request for documents or records under this section shall
not, by itself, create or imply a right of physical entry onto private property."
SECTION 1.(d) G.S. 64-30 reads as rewritten:
"§ 64-30. Actions to be taken; hearing.
Page 2 House Bill 1214-Second Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(a) If, after an investigation, investigation or compliance check, the Commissioner
determines that the complaint an alleged violation is not false or frivolous:frivolous, then the
following shall occur:
(1) If the alleged violation is of G.S. 64-26:
a. The Commissioner shall hold a hearing to determine if a violation of
G.S. 64-26 has occurred and, if appropriate, impose civil penalties in
accordance with the provisions of this Article.
a1. If the employer is entitled to the cure period in accordance with
subsection (b) of this section, prior to imposing civil penalties pursuant
to G.S. 64-31, the Commissioner shall issue a written notice of
noncompliance to the employer. The employer shall have 30 calendar
days from receipt of the notice to cure the alleged violation by
enrolling in E-Verify, completing required verifications, and
otherwise complying with G.S. 64-26. If the employer cures the
alleged violation within the 30-day cure period and submits proof of
compliance to the Commissioner, the Commissioner shall not order
the employer to pay a civil penalty under G.S. 64-31.
a2. If the employer fails to cure the alleged violation within 30 days, or if
the employer is not entitled to the cure period in accordance with
subsection (b) of this section, the Commissioner shall hold a hearing
to determine if a violation of G.S. 64-26 has occurred and, if
appropriate, impose civil penalties in accordance with the provisions
of this Article.
b. If, during the course of the hearing required by sub-subdivision a.
sub-subdivision a2. of this subdivision of this section, the
Commissioner concludes that there is a reasonable likelihood that an
employee is an unauthorized alien, the Commissioner shall notify the
following entities of the possible presence of an unauthorized alien:
1. United States Immigration and Customs Enforcement.
2. Local law enforcement agencies.
(2) If the alleged violation is of G.S. 143-133.3, the Commissioner shall hold a
hearing to determine if a violation of the applicable statute has occurred and,
if appropriate, shall take action under G.S. 64-33.1.
(b) An employer is entitled to the cure period under subdivision (1) of subsection (a) of
this section if the Commissioner has not previously issued an order against the employer pursuant
to G.S. 64-31 at the time of the alleged violation, regardless of whether the employer has
previously utilized the cure period under subdivision (1) of subsection (a) of this section."
SECTION 1.(e) G.S. 64-31 reads as rewritten:
"§ 64-31. Consequences of first violation of G.S. 64-26.
(a) Affidavit Must Be Filed. – For a first violation of G.S. 64-26, the Commissioner shall
order the employer to file a signed sworn affidavit with the Commissioner within three business
days after the order issued pursuant to this subsection is issued. The affidavit shall state with
specificity that the employer has, after consultation with the employee, requested a verification
of work authorization through E-Verify.
(b) Effect of Failure to File Affidavit. – If an employer fails to timely file an affidavit
required by subsection (a) of this section or by G.S. 64-32 or G.S. 64-33, the Commissioner shall
order the employer to pay a civil penalty of ten thousand dollars ($10,000).
(c) Applicability of Section. – This section applies to a violation of G.S. 64-26 in either
of the following circumstances:
House Bill 1214-Second Edition Page 3

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(1) At the time of the violation, the Commissioner has not previously issued an
order against the employer pursuant to this section and the employer fails to
cure the violation within the 30-day cure period provided in G.S. 64-30.
(2) At the time of the violation, the Commissioner has previously issued an order
against the employer pursuant to this section, but the previous order was
issued more than five years before the current violation. However, this
subdivision does not apply if, at the time of the violation, the Commissioner
has previously issued an order against the employer pursuant to G.S. 64-32 or
G.S. 64-33; in such case, the violation shall be subject to G.S. 64-33.
(d) Penalty. – For a violation of G.S. 64-26 that occurs in either of the circumstances
listed in subsection (c) of this section, the Commissioner may order the employer to pay a civil
penalty of up to one thousand dollars ($1,000) for each required employee verification the
employer failed to make, provided that an order under this section shall not require the employer
to pay more than three thousand dollars ($3,000)."
SECTION 1.(f) G.S. 64-32 reads as rewritten:
"§ 64-32. Consequences of second violation of G.S. 64-26.
For a violation of G.S. 64-26 that occurs within five years after an order has been issued
pursuant to G.S. 64-31, the Commissioner shall order the measures required by G.S. 64-31(a)
and shall also order the employer to pay a civil penalty of one thousand dollars ($1,000),
regardless of the number of required employee verifications the employer failed to make.two
thousand dollars ($2,000) for each required employee verification the employer failed to make,
provided that an order under this section shall not require the employer to pay more than ten
thousand dollars ($10,000)."
SECTION 1.(g) G.S. 64-33 reads as rewritten:
"§ 64-33. Consequences of third or subsequent violation of G.S. 64-26.
For a violation of G.S. 64-26 that occurs after an order has been issued pursuant to
G.S. 64-32, the Commissioner shall order the measures required by G.S. 64-31(a), and shall also
order the employer to pay a civil penalty of two thousand dollars ($2,000) five thousand dollars
($5,000) for each required employee verification the employer failed to make.make, provided
that an order under this section shall not require the employer to pay more than twenty-five
thousand dollars ($25,000). The Commissioner may also refer the matter to the Attorney General
for appropriate enforcement action."
SECTION 1.(h) Article 2 of Chapter 64 of the General Statutes is amended by
adding a new section to read:
"§ 64-33.2. Proceeds of civil penalties.
The clear proceeds of all civil penalties imposed pursuant to this Article shall be remitted to
the Civil Penalty and Forfeiture Fund in accordance with G.S. 115C-457.2."
SECTION 1.(i) G.S. 64-34 reads as rewritten:
"§ 64-34. Commissioner to maintain copies of orders.
The Commissioner shall maintain copies of orders issued pursuant to G.S. 64-31, 64-32, and
64-33, and shall maintain a database of the employers and business locations that have a violation
of G.S. 64-26 and make the orders available on the Commissioner's website. The Commissioner
shall also maintain records of compliance checks conducted pursuant to G.S. 64-29."
SECTION 1.(j) G.S. 126-7.1(i) reads as rewritten:
"(i) Each State agency, department, institution, university, community college, and local
education agency shall (i) verify, in accordance with the Basic Pilot Program administered by the
United States Department of Homeland Security pursuant to 8 U.S.C. § 1101, et seq, each
individual's legal status or authorization to work in the United States after hiring the individual
as an employee to work in the United States.United States and (ii) comply with Article 2 of
Chapter 64 of the General Statutes."
SECTION 1.(k) G.S. 153A-99.1 reads as rewritten:
Page 4 House Bill 1214-Second Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
"§ 153A-99.1. County verification of employee work authorization.
(a) Counties Must Use E-Verify. – Each county shall register and participate in E-Verify
to verify the work authorization of new employees hired to work in the United States.
Additionally, each county shall comply with Article 2 of Chapter 64 of the General Statutes.
(b) E-Verify Defined. – As used in this section, the term "E-Verify" means the federal
E-Verify program operated by the United States Department of Homeland Security and other
federal agencies, or any successor or equivalent program used to verify the work authorization
of newly hired employees pursuant to federal law.
(c) Nondiscrimination. – This section shall be enforced without regard to race, religion,
gender, ethnicity, or national origin."
SECTION 1.(l) G.S. 160A-169.1 reads as rewritten:
"§ 160A-169.1. Municipality verification of employee work authorization.
(a) Municipalities Must Use E-Verify. – Each municipality shall register and participate
in E-Verify to verify the work authorization of new employees hired to work in the United States.
Additionally, each municipality shall comply with Article 2 of Chapter 64 of the General Statutes.
(b) E-Verify Defined. – As used in this section, the term "E-Verify" means the federal
E-Verify program operated by the United States Department of Homeland Security and other
federal agencies, or any successor or equivalent program used to verify the work authorization
of newly hired employees pursuant to federal law.
(c) Nondiscrimination. – This section shall be enforced without regard to race, religion,
gender, ethnicity, or national origin."
SECTION 1.(m) This section becomes effective July 1, 2027, and applies to
violations occurring on or after that date.
SECTION 2.(a) G.S. 95-241 reads as rewritten:
"§ 95-241. Discrimination prohibited.
(a) No person shall discriminate or take any retaliatory action against an employee
because the employee in good faith does or threatens to do any of the following:
(1) File a claim or complaint, initiate any inquiry, investigation, inspection,
proceeding or other action, or testify or provide information to any person
with respect to any of the following:
a. Chapter 97 of the General Statutes.
b. Article 2A or Article 16 of this Chapter.
c. Article 2A of Chapter 74 of the General Statutes.
d. G.S. 95-28.1.
e. Article 16 of Chapter 127A of the General Statutes.
f. G.S. 95-28.1A.
g. Article 52 of Chapter 143 of the General Statutes.
h. Article 5F of Chapter 90 of the General Statutes.
i. Article 2 of Chapter 64 of the General Statutes.
(2) Cause any of the activities listed in subdivision (1) of this subsection to be
initiated on an employee's behalf.
(3) Exercise any right on behalf of the employee or any other employee afforded
by Article 2A or Article 16 of this Chapter, by Article 2A of Chapter 74 of the
General Statutes, or by Article 52 of Chapter 143 of the General Statutes.
(4) Comply with the provisions of Article 27 of Chapter 7B of the General
Statutes.
(5) Exercise rights under Chapter 50B. Actions brought under this subdivision
shall be in accordance with the provisions of G.S. 50B-5.5.
(b) It shall not be a violation of this Article for a person to discharge or take any other
unfavorable action with respect to an employee who has engaged in protected activity as set forth
House Bill 1214-Second Edition Page 5

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
under this Article if the person proves by the greater weight of the evidence that it would have
taken the same unfavorable action in the absence of the protected activity of the employee."
SECTION 2.(b) This section becomes effective October 1, 2026, and applies to
discriminatory or retaliatory actions taken on or after that date.
SECTION 3.(a) There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Labor the sum of four hundred forty-eight thousand one hundred ninety-five dollars ($448,195)
in recurring funds for the 2026-2027 fiscal year for five full-time equivalent positions to assist in
the enforcement of this act. These positions shall be designated as exempt policymaking positions
of the Commissioner of Labor, not subject to the limitations under G.S. 126-5(d)(2).
SECTION 3.(b) This section becomes effective July 1, 2026.
SECTION 4. Except as otherwise provided, this act is effective when it becomes
law.
Page 6 House Bill 1214-Second Edition